Hawaii statutes.
[§551E-9] Agent's acceptance. Except
as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, a person accepts appointment as
an agent under a power of attorney by exercising authority or performing duties
as an agent or by any other assertion or conduct indicating acceptance. [L
2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next